src/sje-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

    Multichar_Symbols

! POS
+N +V +A 
+Adv +CC +CS +Interj +Pron +Num

! Verbal MSP
+Prs +Fut +Prt +Prf 
+Ind +Imprt +Cond +Opt
+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 
+Du1 +Du2 +Du3
+Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
+Inf
+Pos +Neg +ConNeg
+GerI +GerII +PrfPrc +VAbess +Sup +VAdv
+Cmp

! Nominal MSP
+Sg +Pl
+Nom +Acc +Gen +Ill +Ine +Ela +Com +Ess +Abe
+Ord +Card
+Qst
+Prop +Ani +Mal +Fem +Sur +Plc +Org +Obj ! Semantic properties of names

+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3


+Use/Sub ! Not part of standard
+Use/NG  ! Part of standard, but not generated
+Use/Circ
+Hyph
+RCmpnd
+Use/-Spell
+CmpN/First

+CLB +PUNCT +PAR +LEFT +RIGHT

%^WG    ! weak grade
%^jDEL  ! vowel deletion in front of j
%^MONB4J ! e to á (before j), o to u before j
%^CDEL   ! Deleting final consonant, biednag
%^MON    ! Monophthong in contract

d2 t2 j2 h2 g2 ! Variable consonants, undergo Auslautherdung
               ! NB! This is the opposite of the sme pattern

! Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <


! Flag diacritics
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@  @D.NeedNoun.ON@  @C.NeedNoun@ ! (Dis)allowing compounds
 @U.Cap.Obl@  @U.Cap.Opt@   ! Allowing downcasing of
                  ! derived names: deatnulasj.
               ! Actually, downcasing should be obligatory


! Key lexicon

LEXICON Root

 Abbreviation ;
 Adjective ;
 Adverb ;
 Conjunction ;
 Interjection ;
 Noun ;
 Numeral ;
 Particle ;
 Postposition ;
 Pronoun ;
 ProperNoun ;
 Punctuation ;
 Subjunction ;
 Verb ;





! Prefixing and compounding
! =========================


! This is for regular compounding. All entries NOT requiring a hyphen should point to this:
LEXICON R
                     +Use/Circ+Cmp#:# Noun ;                       ! This is the normal case.           
      @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@# Verb ;        ! Flag diacr declares that the compound   
!      @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@# Adjective ;   ! needs a N tag later in the derivation  
                +Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:%- Noun ;                      ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so     
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-  Verb ;      ! Sem-julggaštus and maana-gåetie       
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-  Adjective ; ! are allowed.                 

! +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Acronym ;    ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar" ! No acronyms for sje yet.
! +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Numeral ;    ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
! +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for non-hyph.
                                   ! words. viessu-London goes through here.

         +RCmpnd:%- ENDLEX ;     ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller


! This is for compounding with hyphen. All entries REQUIRING a hyphen should point to this:
LEXICON RHyph ! Recursive lexicon from all classes REQUIRING a hyphen to follow.
              ! NBNBNB!!! The hyphen should be added here! NOT in the other lexicons!

                +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Noun ;                                     ! This is the normal case.
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Verb ;       ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Adjective ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation

! +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Acronym ;    ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
! +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.
                               ! London-Hull is covered here, whereas Hull-viessu
                               ! is covered by RHyph + Noun.

         +RCmpnd:%- ENDLEX ;      ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

! Proper noun compounds without hyphens are NOT presently covered - if they were
! to be added, they need to be marked +Use/Sub. Examples: LondonHull & viessuLondon.



! ========== !
! Inflection !
! ========== !

!juollkie+N+Abe             morf =======> upper
!juollkie^WG>htahk   trans
!                                     
!juollkie^WG>Abehtahk   mphon
!juol0kie00htahk         trans ======> lower

! Noun 
! ===============


! even-syllabic
! -------------

LEXICON N_EVEN_NOCG
+N: EVENCASE ;
+N: N_EVEN_W ; ! No CG here

LEXICON N_EVEN
+N: EVENCASE ;
+N:^WG N_EVEN_W ; ! CG here

LEXICON EVENCASE
               N_EVEN_S ;
:%^jDEL%>j     N_EVEN_J ;
N_EVEN_ILL ;

LEXICON N_EVEN_ILL
+Sg+Ill:%>%^MONB4Jj K ;

LEXICON N_EVEN_S
+Sg+Nom:    K ;
+Ess:%>n K ;

LEXICON N_EVEN_W
+Sg+Gen:%>0  K ;
+Sg+Acc:%>v  K ;
+Sg+Ine:%>n K ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:%>s K ;
+Sg+Ela:%>st K ;
+Abe:%>dak K ; ! Norm
!+Abe:%>htaka K ; ! Informants S and Bj 
!+Abe:%>htak K ; ! Informants S and Bj 
+Pl+Nom:%>0  K ;

LEXICON N_EVEN_J
+Sg+Com:%^MONB4Jn   K ;
+Sg+Com:%^MONB4Jna  K ; !variant
+Pl+Gen:    K ;
+Pl+Acc:t   K ;
+Pl+Ine:n   K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:s  K ;
+Pl+Ela:st  K ;
+Pl+Ill:da  K ; !norm
+Pl+Com:    K ;


! odd-syllabic
! ------------

LEXICON N_ODD_VV
+N+Sg+Nom:%^MONB4J PX ;
+N: ODD_OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_ODD_CG
+N+Sg+Nom:%^WG PX ;
+N: ODD_OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_ODD_CG_VV
+N+Sg+Nom:%^WG%^MONB4J PX ;
+N: ODD_OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON N_ODD
+N+Sg+Nom: PX ;
+N: ODD_OBLIQUE ;


LEXICON ODD_OBLIQUE
+Sg+Acc:av PX ;
+Sg+Gen:a PX ;
+Sg+Ill:ij PX ;
+Sg+Ine:in PX ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:is PX ; 
+Sg+Ela:ist PX ; 
+Sg+Com:ijn PX ;
+Ess:in PX ;
+Abe:ahtá PX ;
+Pl+Nom:a PX ;
+Pl+Acc:ijt PX ;
+Pl+Gen:ij PX ;
+Pl+Ill:ijda PX ;
+Pl+Ine:ijn PX ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ijs PX ;
+Pl+Ela:ijst PX ;
+Pl+Com:ij PX ;


LEXICON ODD_OBLIQUE_U
+Sg+Acc:uv PX ;
+Sg+Gen:u PX ;
+Sg+Ill:ij PX ;
+Sg+Ine:in PX ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:is PX ; 
+Sg+Ela:ist PX ; 
+Sg+Com:ijn PX ;
+Ess:in PX ;
+Abe:uhtá PX ;
+Pl+Nom:u PX ;
+Pl+Acc:ijt PX ;
+Pl+Gen:ij PX ;
+Pl+Ill:ijda PX ;
+Pl+Ine:ijn PX ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ijs PX ;
+Pl+Ela:ijst PX ;
+Pl+Com:ij PX ;


! contracted
! ----------

! initial contlex

LEXICON SARVES
 +N:%^WG SARVES-NE ;
 +N:%^MON CONTR-OTH ;

LEXICON SUOLOJ
 +N:%^WG SUOLOJ-NE ;
 +N:%^MON CONTR-OTH ;


! ne contlex

LEXICON SARVES-NE
 +Sg+Nom:%>s K ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;

LEXICON SUOLOJ-NE
 +Sg+Nom:%>j K ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;


! other contlex

LEXICON CONTR-OTH
 N_EVEN_ILL ;
 N_EVEN_W ;
 

! under construction

LEXICON N_CONTR_C
ÅLMAAJ ; ! skall ordnas till

LEXICON ÅLMAAJ
+N+Sg+Nom:%^WGáj PX ;
+N+Sg+Acc:áv PX ;
+N+Sg+Gen:á PX ;
+N+Sg+Ill:áj PX ;
+N+Sg+Ine:án PX ;
+N+Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:ást PX ;
+N+Sg+Ela:ást PX ;
+N+Sg+Com:ájn PX ;
+N+Ess:án PX ;
+N+Ess:%^WGán PX ;
+N+Abe:ádak PX ; ! XXX
+N+Pl+Nom:á PX ;
+N+Pl+Acc:ájt PX ;
+N+Pl+Gen:áj PX ;
+N+Pl+Ill:ájda PX ;
+N+Pl+Ine:ájn PX ;
+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ájs PX ;
+N+Pl+Ela:ájst PX ;
+N+Pl+Com:áj PX ;

LEXICON N_ODD_NOCG
+N+Sg+Nom: PX ;
+N: ODD_OBLIQUE ;

LEXICON BIENA
+N:%^WG%^CDEL BIENASHORT ;
+N: BIENALONG ;

LEXICON BIENALONG
+Sg+Acc:av PX ;
+Sg+Gen:a PX ;
+Sg+Ill:ij PX ;
+Sg+Ine:in PX ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:is PX ;
+Sg+Ela:ist PX ;
+Sg+Com:ijn PX ;
+Ess:in PX ;
+Abe:ahtá PX ;
+Pl+Nom:a PX ;
+Pl+Acc:ijt PX ;
+Pl+Gen:ij PX ;
+Pl+Ill:ijda PX ;
+Pl+Ine:ijn PX ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ijs PX ;
+Pl+Ela:ijst PX ;
+Pl+Com:ij PX ;


LEXICON BIENASHORT
+Sg+Nom: PX ;



LEXICON N_CONTR
+N: CONTRNOMSG ;
+N: CONTROBL ;

LEXICON CONTRNOMSG
+Sg+Nom:%^MONB4Joj K ;
 
LEXICON CONTROBL 
+Sg+Acc:uv PX ;
+Sg+Gen:u PX ;
+Sg+Ill:uj PX ;
+Sg+Ine:un PX ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:us PX ;
+Sg+Ela:ust PX ;
+Sg+Com:ujn PX ;
+Abe:udak PX ;
+Pl+Nom:u PX ;
+Pl+Acc:ujt PX ;
+Pl+Gen:uj PX ;
+Pl+Ill:ujda PX ;
+Pl+Ine:ujn PX ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ujs PX ;
+Pl+Ela:ujst PX ;
+Pl+Com:uj PX ;



LEXICON PX
# ;


! ========== !
! Adjectives !
! ========== !

LEXICON A_EVEN_A
+A+Attr:WG%>a # ;
A_EVEN ;

LEXICON A_EVEN_AA
+A+Attr:%>a # ;
A_EVEN ;

LEXICON A_EVEN_E
+A+Attr:WG%>e # ;
A_EVEN ;

LEXICON A_EVEN_IES
+A+Attr:WG%>ies # ;
A_EVEN ;

LEXICON A_EVEN_B
+A+Attr:^WG%>s # ;
A_EVEN ;


LEXICON A_EVEN_0
+A+Attr: # ;
A_EVEN ;

LEXICON A_EVEN
!+A+Attr: # ;
+A: EVENCASE ;
+A:^WG N_EVEN_W ; ! CG here

+A+Comp+Nom:^WGp # ;
+A+Comp:^WGb ODD_OBLIQUE_U ;


LEXICON A_ODD
+A+Attr: # ;
+A+Sg+Nom: PX ;
+A: ODD_OBLIQUE ;

+A+Comp+Nom:ap # ;
+A+Comp:abb ODD_OBLIQUE_U ;


LEXICON A_ODD_K
+A+Attr: # ; !rätta detta!
+A+Sg+Nom:k PX ;
+A:g ODD_OBLIQUE ;

+A+Comp+Nom:ap # ;
+A+Comp:abb ODD_OBLIQUE_U ;

LEXICON A_ODD_T
+A+Attr:t # ; !rätta detta, tjähppis
+A+Sg+Nom:t PX ;
+A:d ODD_OBLIQUE ;

+A+Comp+Nom:ap # ;
+A+Comp:abb ODD_OBLIQUE_U ;

LEXICON A_ODD_SIS
+A+Attr:sis # ; !rätta detta!
+A+Sg+Nom:s PX ;
+A:s ODD_OBLIQUE ;

+A+Comp+Nom:ap # ;
+A+Comp:abb ODD_OBLIQUE_U ;

LEXICON A_ODD_DIS
+A+Attr:dis # ; !rätta detta!
+A+Sg+Nom:t PX ;
+A:d ODD_OBLIQUE ;

+A+Comp+Nom:ap # ;
+A+Comp:abb ODD_OBLIQUE_U ;


LEXICON A_ODD_k_K
+A+Attr:k # ; 
+A+Sg+Nom:k PX ;
+A:g ODD_OBLIQUE ;

+A+Comp+Nom:ap # ;
+A+Comp:abb ODD_OBLIQUE_U ;


! ===== !
! Verbs !
! ===== !

LEXICON SLADDJIT
BÅHTET ;

LEXICON ÅRROT
+V:     ÅRROT_S ;
+V:%^WG ÅRROT_W ;

LEXICON ÅRROT_S
+Inf:%>ot # ; 
+GerII:%>umin # ;
+PrfPrc:%>um # ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>u #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>un #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>obehtin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>oba #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>op #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>obihtit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>u #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>uv #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>u #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>un #; 

LEXICON ÅRROT_W
+GerI:%>udin # ; 
+VAdv:u # ;
+Sup:%>utjit # ;
+Vabe:%>uhk # ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>ov #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>o #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>oj #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>ojmen #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>ojden #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>ojga #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>ojgan #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>ojme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>ojde #;

LEXICON VESSOT
ÅRROT ;

LEXICON BALLAT
+V:     BALLAT_S ;
+V:%^WG BALLAT_W ;

LEXICON VADTSAAT
+V:     VADTSAAT_S ;
+V:%^WG VADTSAAT_W ;

LEXICON VADTSAAT_S
BALLAT_S ;

LEXICON VADTSAAT_W
BALLAT_W ;


LEXICON LÅHKÅT
+V:     LÅHKÅT_S ;
+V:%^WG LÅHKÅT_W ;

LEXICON LÅHKÅT_S
+Inf:%>åt # ; 
+GerII:%>åmin # ; ! ???
+PrfPrc:%>åm # ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>a #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>á #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>in #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>åbehtin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>åba #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>åp #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>åbihtit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>i #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>iv #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>in #; 

LEXICON LÅHKÅT_W
+GerI:%>ietin # ; 
+VAdv:ie # ;
+Sup:%>átjit # ;
+Vabe:%>iehk # ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>åv #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>å #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>åj #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>åjmen #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>åjden #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>åjga #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>åjme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>åjde #;


LEXICON BÅHTET
+V:     BÅHTET_S ;
+V:%^WG BÅHTET_W ;


LEXICON BÅHTET_S
+Inf:%>et # ; 
+GerII:%>iemin # ;
+PrfPrc:%>ám # ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>a #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>á #;
+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>in #;
+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>ebehtin #;
+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>eba #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>ep #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ebihtit #;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>i #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>iv #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>in #; 

LEXICON BÅHTET_W
+GerI:%>ietin # ; 
+VAdv:ie # ;
+Sup:%>átjit # ;
+Vabe:%>iehk # ;

+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>áv #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>av #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>á #;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>a #;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ij #;
+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>ijmen #;
+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>ijden #;
+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>ijga #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>ijme #;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>ijde #;
